Illinois, session 104th, HB5478.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 5Section 6z-149 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 105/6z-149 new)7    Sec. 6z-149. Cook County school district bridge loan 8program.9    (a) The State Comptroller, in coordination with the State 10Board of Education, shall establish and administer a program 11under which eligible school districts located within Cook 12County may receive interest-free loans from the State Treasury 13to address cash flow shortages caused by the delayed issuance 14of property tax bills by the Cook County Treasurer.15    (b) A school district shall be eligible for a loan under 16this Section if: 17        (1) the Cook County Treasurer fails to issue property 18    tax bills by the statutory deadline under the Property Tax 19    Code;20        (2) the failure results in a delay in the receipt of 21    property tax revenues; and22        (3) the State Board of Education certifies that the 23    district has experienced or will imminently experience a   HB5478- 2 -LRB104 19261 HLH 32707 b1    cash flow deficit as a result of the delay. 2    (c) Loans issued under this Section: 3        (1) shall be limited to the amount necessary to 4    maintain essential operations;5        (2) shall bear no interest to the borrowing district;6        (3) shall be repaid in full upon receipt of delayed 7    property tax revenues; and8        (4) shall not exceed a term of 12 months. 9    (d) The Cook County Treasurer shall reimburse the State 10Treasury for the full amount of interest income lost by the 11State on any loan issued under this Section.12    (e) The State Comptroller shall determine the interest 13amount due under subsection (d) based on the average monthly 14yield of State investment instruments during the term of the 15loan.16    (f) The State Board of Education may adopt rules to 17implement this Section.  18    Section 10. The Property Tax Code is amended by adding 19Section 20-227 as follows: 20    (35 ILCS 200/20-227 new)21    Sec. 20-227. Responsibility for State bridge loans.22    (a) If the Cook County Treasurer fails to issue property 23tax bills in accordance with this Code and a school district 24receives a loan pursuant to Section 6z-149 of the State   HB5478- 3 -LRB104 19261 HLH 32707 b1Finance Act as a result of that failure, the Cook County 2Treasurer shall reimburse the State for: 3        (1) interest lost by the State; and4        (2) reasonable administrative costs incurred by the 5    State in administering the loan. 6    (b) Reimbursement required under this Section shall be 7paid from funds available to the Office of the Cook County 8Treasurer and may not be deducted from distributions owed to 9any school district.10    (c) If reimbursement is not made within 90 days after a 11written demand by the Comptroller, the Comptroller may 12withhold State payments otherwise payable to Cook County in an 13amount necessary to satisfy the liability.  14    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 15becoming law.